Nevada, session 83, AB405.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Council on
Food Security created by NRS 232.4966 shall conduct a study to
evaluate food insecurity in this State and develop strategies to
coordinate statewide efforts to address food insecurity. The study
must include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) An evaluation of the existing laws and policies in this State
that are designed to address food insecurity;
(b) An identification of areas in this State where community
gardens or urban farms could be developed to reduce levels of food
insecurity;
(c) A study of the coordination of the efforts of the State
Government, local governments and private organizations to reduce
food insecurity in this State; and
(d) Recommendations for strategies to reduce food insecurity in
this State through the coordination of the efforts of the State
Government, local governments and private organizations that the
Council determines are appropriate.
2. On or before December 1, 2026, the Council shall prepare
and submit a written report of the results of the study conducted
pursuant to this section to the:
(a) Director of the State Department of Agriculture; and
(b) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the 84th Session of the Legislature.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)